District of Columbia statutes.
1-811.02

Uses of amounts in Fund.

Amounts in the Federal Supplemental Fund shall be used for the accumulation of funds in order to finance obligations of the Federal Government for benefits and necessary administrative expenses under the provisions of this chapter, in accordance with the methodology selected by the Secretary under § 1-811.04(b), except that payments from the Fund for administrative expenses may be made only to the extent and in such amounts as are provided in advance in appropriations acts.

History

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 726, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11052
Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2681-532, Pub. L. 105-277, § 801(g)(3)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-766.2.